Wyoming, session 2025, HB0276.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-3-612 is created to read:

18-3-612. Agreements with the United States to
enforce immigration laws; reporting requirements.

HB0276

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0691
(a) Each county sheriff, in consultation with the
board of county commissioners, shall negotiate the terms of
and enter into a written agreement between the county and
the United States attorney general or department of
justice, as provided by 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g), for the
enforcement of federal immigration and customs laws,
detentions, removals and investigations in Wyoming. The
agreement shall be signed by the sheriff and the board of
county commissioners or as otherwise required by the
appropriate federal agency.

(b) Not later than October 1, 2025 and each October 1
thereafter, each county sheriff shall report to the Wyoming
attorney general on:

(i) The status of negotiations with the United
States attorney general and the status of any agreement
entered into under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g);

(ii) Whether the United States attorney general
has declined to enter into an agreement with the county
under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) and the reasons for declining;

HB0276

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0691
(iii) If the United States attorney general has
declined to enter into an agreement with the county, the
county's communication and cooperation with the United
States attorney general under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g).

(c) Not later than November 1, 2025 and each November
1 thereafter, the attorney general shall report to the
joint judiciary interim committee on the information that
each county sheriff communicated to the Wyoming attorney
general under subsection (b) of this section.

(d) A county that fails to enter or fails to attempt
to enter into an agreement required by subsection (a) of
this section shall not be eligible to receive any state
administered federal funds associated with law enforcement
and law enforcement training for each fiscal year in which
the county is not in compliance with subsection (a) of this
section. A county that has reported to the Wyoming attorney
general that the United States attorney general has
declined to enter into an agreement under 8 U.S.C. §
1357(g) shall not be subject to this subsection.

HB0276

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0691
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0276